Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-247
Town clerk; duties; penalties, recovery of.

The town clerk shall prosecute in the name of his town, or otherwise as may be necessary, for all penalties given by law to such town or for its use, and for which no other officer is specially directed to prosecute; and he shall receive all accounts which may be presented to him against the town.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 45, p. 144;

R.S.1913, § 1031;

C.S.1922, § 933;

C.S.1929, § 26-247;

R.S.1943, § 23-247.